Hawaii statutes.
[§173A‑2.6] Land acquisition
priorities. In advising the department and the board, the
commission shall give the following lands priority in its recommendations for
acquisitions:

(1) Lands having exceptional value due to the
presence of:

(A) Unique aesthetic resources;

(B) Unique and valuable cultural or
archaeological resources; or

(C) Habitats for threatened or endangered
species of flora, fauna, or aquatic resources;

(2) Lands that are in imminent danger of development;

(3) Lands that are in imminent danger of being
modified, changed, or used in a manner to diminish its value;

(4) Lands providing critical habitats for threatened
or endangered species that are in imminent danger of being harmed or negatively
impacted;

(5) Lands containing cultural or archaeological sites
or resources that are in danger of theft or destruction; and

(6) Lands that are unique and productive agricultural
lands. [L 2006, c 254, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next